trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="blog__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~gen / ~s / ~gene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sne</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="jitterbug__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~gen / ~ / ~gene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coach__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~es / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="drink__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~s / ~sne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sne</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="event__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~s / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="styk__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / # / ~ / #; special -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="metal__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~let / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kartof/fel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~fel / ~len | (~felen) / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>fel</l>       <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>felen</l>     <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nik/kel__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~kel / ~kelet | (~let) / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l>kel</l>       <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kelet</l>     <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>let</l>       <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="forskel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~len / ~le / ~lene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kriminel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Utrum; ~ / ~le / ~le / ~le -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rom__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~men / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="minim/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~ummet / ~a / ~aene -->
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ummet</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aene</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sum__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~men / ~mer / ~merne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>merne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pen__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~nen / ~ne / ~nene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="paraplydræg" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>paraplydræg</i><par n="blog__n"/></e>
<e lm="schakkel" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>schak</i><par n="nik/kel__n"/></e>
<e lm="basketball">      <i>basketball</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="sportsevent">     <i>sportsevent</i><par n="event__n"/></e>
<e lm="blog">            <i>blog</i><par n="blog__n"/></e>
<e lm="bug">             <i>bug</i><par n="blog__n"/></e>
<e lm="coach">           <i>coach</i><par n="coach__n"/></e>
<e lm="date">            <i>date</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="download">        <i>download</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="drink">           <i>drink</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="forskel">         <i>forskel</i><par n="forskel__n"/></e>
<e lm="jitterbug">       <i>jitterbug</i><par n="jitterbug__n"/></e>
<e lm="humbug">          <i>humbug</i><par n="jitterbug__n"/></e>
<e lm="joint">           <i>joint</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="kartoffel">       <i>kartof</i><par n="kartof/fel__n"/></e>
<e lm="kriminel">        <i>kriminel</i><par n="kriminel__n"/></e>
<e lm="metal">           <i>metal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="interval">        <i>interval</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapel">           <i>kapel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="hotel">           <i>hotel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="motel">           <i>motel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="minimum">         <i>minim</i><par n="minim/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="nikkel">          <i>nik</i><par n="nik/kel__n"/></e>
<e lm="nul">             <i>nul</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="pen">             <i>pen</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
<e lm="rom">             <i>rom</i><par n="rom__n"/></e>
<e lm="stationcar">      <i>stationcar</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="sum">             <i>sum</i><par n="sum__n"/></e>
<e lm="volleyball">      <i>volleyball</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
